Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202645-352
Installment loan licensee; permitted contacts.

(1) Section 45-351 shall not prohibit the licensee from:

(a) Contacting any person in order to discover property belonging to the borrower that may be seized to satisfy a debt that has been reduced to judgment;

(b) Making amicable demand and filing suit on the debt; or

(c) Contacting persons related to the borrower if permission is specifically given in writing at the time the debt arises or at any time after such debt arises.

(2) An installment loan licensee may contact any person without the borrower's consent:

(a) To ascertain information relating to a borrower's credit worthiness, credit standing, credit capacity, character, general reputation, personal characteristics, or mode of living which is used or expected to be used or collected in whole or in part for the purpose of serving as a factor in establishing the borrower's eligibility for credit or insurance if such contacts are not designed to collect a delinquent debt; or

(b) To locate the borrower when the licensee has reason to believe the borrower has changed his or her employment or has moved from his or her last-known address.

Laws 1965, c. 268, § 19, p. 767;

Laws 2007, LB124, § 38;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 73.